Mississippi, session 2026, HB850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 41-41-45 and 97-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, which prohibit the performing or inducing of an abortion except where necessary for the preservation of the mother's life or where the pregnancy was caused by rape, are repealed. SECTION 2.  There shall be a statewide special election for the purpose of determining whether Section 1 of this act will take effect.  The special election shall be held on Tuesday, November 3, 2026, and shall be conducted in the same manner as regular general elections are held.  The question put before the voters at the statewide special election shall read on the ballots as follows: "PLEASE VOTE 'YES' OR 'NO' Abortions shall be prohibited in Mississippi except where necessary for the preservation of the mother's life or where the pregnancy was caused by rape. 'YES': ________              'NO': ________" The qualified electors may indicate their preference on the line following the answer that they prefer. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question in the special election vote "Yes," then Section 1 of this act shall not take effect.  If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question in the election vote "No," then Section 1 shall take effect from and after January 1, 2027. SECTION 3.  Section 1 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027, if a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question in the election provided for in Section 2 of this act vote "NO"; and Section 2 of this act shall take effect and be in force from and after the passage of this act.